Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
REQUIRED PROVISIONS AND BENEFITS

§432:1-601 Contract limitations for
handicapped children and children with intellectual disabilities. All
individual and group hospital or medical service plan contracts, delivered or
issued for delivery in this State after May 8, 1968, which provide that
coverage of a dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting
age for dependent children specified in the contract shall also provide in
substance that attainment of such limiting age shall not operate to terminate
the coverage of such child while the child is and continues to be both (1)
incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of intellectual disability or
physical handicap, and (2) chiefly dependent upon the policyholder, subscriber or
employee as the case may be, for support and maintenance, provided proof of
such incapacity and dependency is furnished to the hospital service or medical
indemnity association by the policyholder, subscriber or employee within
thirty-one days of the child's attainment of the limiting age and subsequently
as may be required by such association. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2011, c
220, §§7, 12]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next